Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Eligible energy-efficient residential property" means a
newly constructed residential property that is constructed in
Oklahoma and is completed on or after January 1, 2027;
2. "Home Energy Rating System (HERS) Index" means the
nationally recognized scoring system established by the Residential

Req. No. 16063 Page 1

Ener gy Services Network (RESNET) to measure a home's energy
performance, as defined in the ANSI/RESNET/ICC 301 standard; and
3. "Taxpayer" means a builder who constructed the eligible
energy-efficient residential property, or if one or more taxpayer
qualifies as the builder, the primary contractor.
B. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant
to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in the amount
of:
1. Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for any eligible energy-
efficient residential property constructed and certified as meeting
the United States Environmental Protection Agency's Energy Star
Homes program, or a maximum HERS Index, before any on-site power
production, of:
a. 46 in climate zone 3A, and
b. 44 in climate zone 4A, or
2. Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) for any eligible energy-
efficient residential property constructed and certified as meeting
the United States Department of Energy's Zero Energy Ready Homes
Efficient New Homes program, or a maximum HERS Index, before any on-
site power production, of:
a. 43 in climate zone 3A, and
b. 41 in climate zone 4A.

Req. No. 16063 Page 2

C. The credits provided for in subsection B of this section may
each only be claimed once by the taxpayer during the tax year when
the property was completed.
D. If the credits provided for in subsection B of this section
exceed the amount of income taxes due, or if the taxpayer does not
have Oklahoma income tax liability on a particular tax year, the
amount of the each tax credit allowed, but not used in any tax year,
may be carried over as a credit against subsequent tax liability for
a period not exceeding four (4) years following the completion of
the property.
E. The earned credits provided for in subsection B of this
section, to the extent not previously utilized, shall be permitted
to be freely transferrable to subsequent transferees.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

60-2-16063 AO 02/09/26








Req. No. 16063 Page 3